Hawaii statutes.
§226-26 Objectives and policies for
socio-cultural advancement--public safety. (a) Planning for the State's
socio-cultural advancement with regard to public safety shall be directed
towards the achievement of the following objectives:

(1) Assurance of public safety and adequate
protection of life and property for all people.

(2) Optimum organizational readiness and capability
in all phases of emergency management to maintain the strength, resources, and
social and economic well-being of the community in the event of civil
disruptions, wars, natural disasters, and other major disturbances.

(3) Promotion of a sense of community responsibility
for the welfare and safety of Hawaii's people.

(b) To achieve the public safety objectives,
it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Ensure that public safety programs are effective
and responsive to community needs.

(2) Encourage increased community awareness and
participation in public safety programs.

(c) To further achieve public safety
objectives related to criminal justice, it shall be the policy of this State
to:

(1) Support criminal justice programs aimed at
preventing and curtailing criminal activities.

(2) Develop a coordinated, systematic approach to
criminal justice administration among all criminal justice agencies.

(3) Provide a range of correctional resources which
may include facilities and alternatives to traditional incarceration in order
to address the varied security needs of the community and successfully
reintegrate offenders into the community.

(d) To further achieve public safety
objectives related to emergency management, it shall be the policy of this
State to:

(1) Ensure that responsible organizations are in a
proper state of readiness to respond to major war-related, natural, or
technological disasters and civil disturbances at all times.

(2) Enhance the coordination between emergency
management programs throughout the State. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986,
c 276, §25]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next